Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-264
Deeds executed in another state; omission of private seal, validated.

No deed of conveyance or other instrument affecting real estate in this state, which has been executed and acknowledged or proved in any other state, territory or district of the United States and which has been executed and acknowledged or proved in accordance with the laws of such state, territory or district, shall be held invalid because of the failure of the grantor to affix thereto his private seal, although the affixing of such private seal may be required by the laws of such state, territory or district. Every such deed of conveyance or other instrument, which has been so executed and acknowledged or proved, is declared to be legal, valid and binding, and all such deeds of conveyance or other instruments, and the record thereof in the office of the register of deeds of the county in which said real estate is situated, shall be competent evidence in the courts of this state.

Laws 1917, c. 223, § 4, p. 546;

C.S.1922, § 5657;

C.S.1929, § 76-263;

R.S.1943, § 76-264.